Utah statutes.
53-5-702.   Definitions.
(1)  As used in this part:
(a)  "Board" means the Concealed Firearm Review Board created in Section
53-5-703.
(b)  "Bureau" means the Bureau of Criminal Identification created in Section
53-10-201 within the Department of Public Safety.
(c)  "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Public Safety.
(d)  "Conviction" means criminal conduct where the filing of a criminal charge
has resulted in:
(i)  a finding of guilt based on evidence presented to a judge or jury;
(ii)  a guilty plea;
(iii)  a plea of nolo contendere;
(iv)  a plea of guilty or nolo contendere which is held in abeyance pending
the successful completion of probation;
(v)  a pending diversion agreement; or
(vi)  a conviction which has been reduced pursuant to Section 76-3-402.
(2)  The definitions in Section 76-10-501 apply to this part.
